Massachusetts, session 194th, H2487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 228 the
following section:-
Section 228½. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Board”, the board of registration in dentistry established pursuant to section 19 of
chapter 13.
“Dental services”, diagnostic, preventative or corrective treatment of the teeth and
associated structures of the oral cavity, including, but not limited to, oral surgery and the
provision of orthodontia and prostheses.
of 2

“Dental services provider”, a provider of dental services, including, but not limited to, a
dentist registered by the board pursuant to section 45 of chapter 112, a dental hygienist registered
by the board pursuant to section 51 of said chapter 112, a dental assistant register by the board
pursuant to section 51½ of said chapter 112 or an oral and maxillofacial surgeon certified by the
American Board of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery.
(b) Upon request by a patient or prospective patient, a dental services provider shall
provide a quote of the costs associated with any dental services prior to performing any dental
services; provided, however, that if a patient or prospective patient schedules a series of
procedures or services as part of a continued course of treatment, the patient or prospective
patient may waive the requirement to receive such quote from the dental services provider for
that course of treatment.
(c) If a dental services provider completes any dental services without providing the
patient with a quote pursuant to subsection (b), the patient may file a complaint with the board.
Upon receipt of a complaint pursuant to this section, the board shall conduct an investigation into
whether the completed dental services were medically necessary. If, as a result of such
investigation, the board has reasonable cause to believe that the completed dental services were
not medically necessary, it shall file a written report of the violation with the attorney general
who shall, within 3 months following receipt of such report, notify the board in writing of the
action taken with respect to such violation.
of 2